Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2655.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Sections 3219(a)(1), 4216(a) and 5219(a)(1) of Title 68 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes are amended to read:§ 3219. Amendment of declaration.(a) Number of votes required.--(1) The declaration, including the plats and plans, may be amended only by vote or agreement of unit owners of units to which at least:(i) sixty-seven percent of the votes [in the association are allocated] collected are in favor;(ii) any larger majority of the votes as specified 123456789101112131415161718192021 in the declaration [specifies]; or(iii) a smaller number of the votes as specified in the declaration if all of the units are restricted exclusively to nonresidential use.* * *§ 4216. Amendment of declaration.(a) Number of votes required.--Except in cases of amendments that may be executed by a declarant under section 4209 (relating to exercise of development rights), the association under section 4107 (relating to eminent domain), 4206(c) (relating to leasehold cooperatives), 4208(c) (relating to limited common elements), 4211(a) (relating to relocation of boundaries between adjoining units) or 4212 (relating to subdivision of units), the executive board of the association under subsection (f) or certain proprietary lessees under section 4208(b), 4211(a), 4212(b) or 4217(b) (relating to termination of cooperative ownership), and except as limited by subsection (d) and section 4218 (relating to rights of secured lenders and secured creditors), the declaration may be amended only by vote or agreement of proprietary lessees of cooperative interests to which at least [67% of the votes in the association are allocated or]:(1) sixty-seven percent of the votes collected are in favor;(2) any larger majority of the votes as specified in the declaration [specifies. The declaration may specify]; or(3) a smaller number of votes only if all of the units are restricted exclusively to nonresidential use.* * *§ 5219. Amendment of declaration.20260HB2655PN3666 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (a) Number of votes required.--(1) The declaration, including the plats and plans, may be amended only by vote or agreement of unit owners of units to which at least:(i) 67% of the votes [in the association are allocated] collected are in favor; [or](ii) a larger percentage of the votes in the association as specified in the declaration; or(iii) a smaller percentage of the votes in the association as specified in the declaration if all units are restricted exclusively to nonresidential use.* * *Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20260HB2655PN3666 - 3 - 12345678910111213